Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6017.01
Medicaid, defined.

Medicaid means the medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act.

Laws 1986, LB 782, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 78.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.